Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1604
No temporary board; petition; notice; hearing; order.

(1) If no temporary board of trustees is appointed, then not later than four weeks after the filing of such petition in the office of the county board of the county wherein the greater portion of the area of the proposed district is located, such county board shall give notice by publication, in one or more newspapers having a general circulation in the proposed district, once each week during the two weeks prior to such meeting of the time and place where the petition will be heard.

(2) At the time and place so fixed in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the county board of such county shall meet for a hearing in regard to the formation of such a district as proposed. All persons in such proposed road improvement district shall have an opportunity to be heard touching the location and boundary of the proposed district. Within one week after said meeting, the county board, referred to in subsection (1) of this section, shall by an order determine as to the formation of the district and the boundaries thereof, whether the same way such boundaries are described in such petition or otherwise. If a majority of the resident property owners of such proposed road improvement district shall file written protests, within ten days after the first publication of the notice, the county board shall abandon all such proceedings.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. III, § 4, p. 526.